cs: Integrace kompatibilních ochranných pomůcek: Kompatibilní s kompresní košilí/vestou; Vložka do bundy (kapsa); Kompatibilní s krčním chráničem; Vložka do závodní kombinézy (kapsa); Samostatné připínací; Univerzální; Nespecifikováno; Jiné
zh-TW: 相容防護裝備整合方式: 與緊身衣/背心相容; 外套護具墊片 (口袋); 與護頸相容; 賽車服護具墊片 (口袋); 獨立綁帶式; 通用; 未指定; 其他
nb: Kompatibel integrering av verneutstyr: Kompatibel med kompresjonstrøye/-vest; Jakkeinnlegg (lomme); Kompatibel med nakkekrage; Kjøredressinnlegg (lomme); Frittstående med stropper; Universell; Uspesifisert; Annet
hu: Kompatibilis védőfelszerelés-integráció: Kompressziós inggel/mellénnyel kompatibilis; Dzsekibetéthez (zseb); Nyakvédővel kompatibilis; Versenyruha-betéthez (zseb); Önálló pántos; Univerzális; Nincs megadva; Egyéb
el: Συμβατή ενσωμάτωση προστατευτικού εξοπλισμού: Συμβατό με μπλούζα/γιλέκο συμπίεσης; Ένθετο μπουφάν (τσέπη); Συμβατό με προστατευτικό αυχένα; Ένθετο αγωνιστικής φόρμας (τσέπη); Αυτόνομο με ιμάντες; Γενικής χρήσης; Μη καθορισμένο; Άλλο
tr: Uyumlu koruyucu ekipman entegrasyonu: Kompresyon gömlek/yelek ile uyumlu; Ceket eklentisi (cep); Boyunluk ile uyumlu; Yarış kıyafeti eklentisi (cep); Bağımsız kayışlı; Evrensel; Belirtilmemiş; Diğer
ru: Совместимая интеграция защитного снаряжения: Совместимо с компрессионной рубашкой / жилетом; Вставка для куртки (карман); Совместимо с защитой шеи; Вставка для гоночного костюма (карман); Самостоятельная защита на ремнях; Универсальная; Не указано; Другое
lt-LT: Suderinama apsauginės įrangos integracija: Suderinama su kompresiniais marškinėliais / liemene; Striukės įdėklas (kišenė); Suderinama su kaklo įtvaru; Lenktyninio kostiumo įdėklas (kišenė); Atskira, tvirtinama dirželiais; Universalus; Nenurodyta; Kita
bg-BG: Съвместима интеграция със защитна екипировка: Съвместимо с компресираща тениска/жилетка; Подложка за яке (в джоб); Съвместимо с протектор за врат; Подложка за състезателен екип (в джоб); Самостоятелно с каишки; Универсално; Неопределено; Друго
pl: Kompatybilna integracja z wyposażeniem ochronnym: Kompatybilny z koszulką/kamizelką kompresyjną; Wkładka do kurtki (kieszeń); Kompatybilny ze stabilizatorem karku; Wkładka do kombinezonu wyścigowego (kieszeń); Zakładany oddzielnie na paski; Uniwersalny; Nieokreślony; Inne
fr: Intégration compatible avec équipement de protection: Compatible avec t-shirt/gilet de compression; Insert pour blouson (poche); Compatible avec protège-cou; Insert pour combinaison (poche); À sangles autonome; Universel; Non spécifié; Autre
ja: 互換性のある保護具の統合: コンプレッションシャツ/ベスト対応; ジャケットインサート (ポケット); ネックブレース対応; レーシングスーツインサート (ポケット); スタンドアロンストラップ式; ユニバーサル; 指定なし; その他
vi: Tích hợp thiết bị bảo hộ tương thích: Tương thích với áo nén/áo vest nén; Gắn vào túi áo khoác; Tương thích với đai nẹp cổ; Túi nhét trong bộ đồ đua; Đeo rời (có dây đeo); Phổ thông; Không chỉ định; Khác
ko: 호환 보호 장비 연동 방식: 컴프레션 셔츠/조끼 호환; 재킷 인서트(포켓); 넥 브레이스 호환; 레이싱 슈트 인서트(포켓); 독립형 스트랩온; 범용; 미지정; 기타
fi: Yhteensopivien suojavarusteiden integrointi: Kompressiopaita / -liiviyhteensopiva; Takkiin sijoitettava (tasku); Niskatukiyhteensopiva; Ajopukuun sijoitettava (tasku); Itsenäinen hihnakiinnitteinen; Yleinen; Määrittelemätön; Muu
de: Integration kompatibler Schutzausrüstung: Kompatibel mit Kompressionsshirt/-weste; Jackeneinsatz (Tasche); Kompatibel mit Nackenstütze; Rennanzugeinsatz (Tasche); Eigenständig (zum Anschnallen); Universal; Nicht spezifiziert; Sonstige
pt-PT: Integração de equipamentos de proteção compatíveis: Compatível com camisola/colete de compressão; Inserção no casaco (bolso); Compatível com colar cervical; Inserção no fato de corrida (bolso); Com alças independente; Universal; Não especificado; Outro
pt-BR: Integração de equipamentos de proteção compatível: Compatível com camisa/colete de compressão; Inserto de jaqueta (bolso); Compatível com protetor cervical; Inserto de macacão de corrida (bolso); De tiras independente; Universal; Não especificado; Outro
es: Integración de equipo de protección compatible: Compatible con camiseta/chaleco de compresión; Inserción en chaqueta (bolsillo); Compatible con collarín ortopédico; Inserción en traje de carreras (bolsillo); Ajustable de forma independiente; Universal; No especificado; Otro
da: Kompatibel integration med beskyttelsesudstyr: Kompatibel med kompressionsskjorte/-vest; Jakkeindsats (lomme); Kompatibel med nakkekrave; Indsats til racerdragt (lomme); Enkeltstående (fastgøres med rem); Universel; Uspecificeret; Andet
hr-HR: Integracija kompatibilne zaštitne opreme: Kompatibilno s kompresijskom majicom/prslukom; Umetak za jaknu (džep); Kompatibilno sa štitnikom za vrat; Umetak za trkaće odijelo (džep); Samostalno (pričvršćivanje remenom); Univerzalno; Nije navedeno; Ostalo
sl-SI: Integracija združljive zaščitne opreme: Združljivo s kompresijsko majico/telovnikom; Vložek za jakno (žep); Združljivo z opornico za vrat; Vložek za dirkaški kombinezon (žep); Samostojno s paščki; Univerzalno; Nedoločeno; Drugo
it: Integrazione compatibile con dispositivi di protezione individuale: Compatibile con maglia/gilet a compressione; Inserto per giacca (tasca); Compatibile con collare cervicale; Inserto per tuta da gara (tasca); Indipendente con cinghie; Universale; Non specificata; Altro
th: การประกอบอุปกรณ์ป้องกันที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: รองรับเสื้อรัดกล้ามเนื้อ/เสื้อกั๊ก; ช่องใส่ในแจ็กเก็ต; รองรับเฝือกคอ; ช่องใส่ในชุดแข่ง; แบบสายรัดแยกชิ้น; อเนกประสงค์; ไม่ระบุ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Spojenie kompatibilných ochranných prostriedkov: Kompatibilné s kompresnou košeľou/vestou; Vložka do bundy (vrecko); Kompatibilné s nákrčníkom; Vložka do pretekárskej kombinézy (vrecko); Samostatné upevnenie na popruhy; Univerzálne; Nešpecifikované; Iné
en: Compatible protective gear integration: Compression shirt/vest compatible; Jacket insert (pocket); Neck brace compatible; Racing suit insert (pocket); Standalone strap-on; Universal; Unspecified; Other
zh-CN: 适配的防护装备集成: 兼容压缩衣/马甲; 夹克内插（口袋）; 兼容护颈; 赛车服内插（口袋）; 独立绑带式; 通用; 未指定; 其他
nl: Compatibele beschermende uitrusting integratie: Compatibel met compressieshirt/-vest; Inzetstuk voor jas (zak); Compatibel met nekbrace; Inzetstuk voor racepak (zak); Vast te gespen (standalone); Universeel; Ongespecificeerd; Overig
sv: Kompatibel integrering av skyddsutrustning: Kompatibel med kompressionsströja/-väst; Inlägg för jacka (ficka); Kompatibel med nackskydd; Inlägg för tävlingsdräkt (ficka); Fristående med spännen; Universell; Ospecificerad; Övrigt
ro-RO: Integrare compatibilă a echipamentului de protecție: Compatibil cu tricou/vestă de compresie; Inserție jachetă (buzunar); Compatibil cu protecție pentru gât (neck brace); Inserție costum de curse (buzunar); Independent cu prindere prin curele; Universal; Nespecificat; Altele